apertium-mar.mar.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ऄअआइईउऊऋऌऍऎएऐऑॲऒओऔकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनऩपफबभमयरऱलळऴवशषसहऻऺऽािीुूृॄॅँॆेैॉॊोौ्ॎॐ॓॔क़ख़ग़ज़ड़ढ़फ़य़ॠॡॢॣंः</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n"			c="noun" />
		<sdef n="vaux"		c="auxiliary verb" />
		<sdef n="p1"		c="first person" />
		<sdef n="p2"		c="second person" />
		<sdef n="p3"		c="third person" />
		<sdef n="vblex" />
		<sdef n="impf" />
		<sdef n="perf" />
		<sdef n="inf"/>
		<sdef n="imp"/>
		<sdef n="subj"/>
		<sdef n="adj"/>
		<sdef n="adv"/>
		<sdef n="fut"/>
		<sdef n="pros"/>
		<sdef n="past"/>
		<sdef n="pres"/>
		<sdef n="num"/>
		<sdef n="post"/>
		<sdef n="attr"/>
		<sdef n="prn" />
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" />
		<sdef n="cnjsub" />
		<sdef n="clit" />
		<sdef n="compl" 	c="Completive" />
		<sdef n="emph" />
		<sdef n="part" />
		<sdef n="dt" />
		<sdef n="dist" />
		<sdef n="prox" />
		<sdef n="det" />
		<sdef n="hon" 		c="Honorific" />
		<sdef n="hon2"		c="Higher honorific" />
		<sdef n="incl"		c="Inclusive" />
		<sdef n="excl"		c="Exclusive" />
		<sdef n="hort"      c="Hortative" />
		<sdef n="hab"      c="Habitual" />
		<sdef n="incp"		c="Inceptive" />
		<sdef n="interr"    c="interrogative" />
		<sdef n="refl"	 	c="Reflexive" />
		<sdef n="rel"		c="Relative" />
		<sdef n="corel"		c="Correlative" />
		<sdef n="indef" 	c="Indefinite" />
		<sdef n="ord" 		c="Ordinal" />
		<sdef n="mult" 		c="Multiplicator" />
		<sdef n="aggr" 		c="Aggregative" />
		<sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
		<sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
		<sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/>
		<sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>	
		<sdef n="top"     c="Topological"/>
		<sdef n="subj"    c="subject"/>
		<sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>
		<sdef n="ads"     c="Adsentential"/>
		<sdef n="inj"     c="Interjection"/>
		<sdef n="gna" 	  c="Verbal adverb"/>
		<sdef n="gpr" 	  c="Verbal adjective"/>
		<sdef n="ger" 	  c="Gerund"/>


		<sdef n="f"  />
		<sdef n="m"  />
		<sdef n="nt" />
		<sdef n="mf" />
		<sdef n="mfn"/>
		<sdef n="sg" />
		<sdef n="pl" />
		<sdef n="sp" />
		<sdef n="nom"/>
		<sdef n="acc"/>
		<sdef n="dat"/>
		<sdef n="gen"/>
		<sdef n="loc"/>
		<sdef n="abl"/>
		<sdef n="inst"/>
		<sdef n="obl"/>
		<sdef n="erg"/>
		<sdef n="abbr"/>

		<sdef n="percent"  	 c="Percent"/>
		<sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
		<sdef n="sent"       c="Sentence marker"/>
		<sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
		<sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
		<sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
		<sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
		<sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>
		<sdef n="barb"/>

	</sdefs>

	<pardefs>
		
		<pardef n="__emph">
			<e><p><l>च</l><r>च<s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__part">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__cnjcoo">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__cnjsub">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__adsen">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="ads"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->      
		<pardef n="numeros">
		  <e> 		<re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	  	  <e>       <re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
	  	  <e>       <re>([५६७८९]|[१२३४५६७८९][०१२३४५६७८९]+)</re><p><l><b/>व्या</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="separa">
		  <e><re>[.\?;:!।॥]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="guio">
		  <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="coma">
		  <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="quotes">
		  <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
		  <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="paresq">
		  <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="pardret">
		  <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="barb">
			<e><re>[A-Za-zÁÁÁÁĂĂÂÂÂÂÄÄÄÄÀÀĄĄÅÅÅÃÃÃÃÆḂḂĆĆČČÇÇĊĊĎĎḊḊÐĐĐÉÉÉÉĚĚÊÊÊÊËËËËĖĖÈÈĒĒĒĒĘĘŊFḞḞĞĞĞĞĞĢĢĠĠÍÍÍÍÎÎÎÎÏÏÏÏİİÌÌĪĪĪĪĮĮĨĨĲĶĶĹĹĽĽĻĻŁŁṀṀŃŃŇŇŅŅÑÑÑÑŒÓÓÓÓÔÔÔÔÖÖÖÖÒÒØØÕÕÕÕṖṖŔŔŘŘŖŖŚŚŠŠŞŞŞŞṠṠẞŤŤṪṪŦŦŦÞÚÚÚÚÛÛÛÛÜÜÜÜÙÙŪūūŪŲŲŮŮŨŨŴŴÝÝÝÝŶŶŸŸŸŸŹŹŽŽŽŻŻáááăăââââääääààąąåååããããæḃḃććččççċċďďḋḋðđđııééééěěêêêêëëëëėėèèēēēēęęŋḟḟğğğğğģģġġííííîîîîïïïïììīīīīįįĩĩĳķķĸĺĺľľļļłłœṁṁńńňňņņññññóóóóôôôôööööòòøøõõõõṗṗŕŕřřŗŗśśššşşşşṡṡßťťṫṫŧŧŧþúúúúŭûûûûüüüüùùūūūūųųůůũũŵŵýýýýŷŷÿÿÿÿźźžžžżż]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="barb"/></r></p></e> 
			<e><p><l>द</l><r>द<s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>िद</l><r>िद<s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आर</l><r>आर<s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>अँड</l><r>अँड<s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__abbr">
			<!-- etc -->
			<e> 		<p><l>इ</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>इ.</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आदी</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			
			<!-- doctor -->
			<e> 		<p><l>डॉ</l><r>डॉ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>डॉ.</l><r>डॉ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

			<!-- km -->
			<e> 		<p><l>किमी</l><r>किमी.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>किमी.</l><r>किमी.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

			<!-- father -->
			<e> 		<p><l>फ्र</l><r>फ्र.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>फ्र.</l><r>फ्र.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

			<!-- rupee -->
			<e> 		<p><l>रु</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>रु.</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

			<!-- pH (wot) -->
			<e> 		<p><l>पीएच</l><r>पीएच.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>पीएच.</l><r>पीएच.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

			<!-- EESAA PURVI -->
			<e> 		<p><l>ई पू</l><r>ई. पू.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ई. पू</l><r>ई. पू.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__inj">
			<e> 		<p><l>ए</l><r>ए<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>रे</l><r>रे<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ओ</l><r>ओ<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="inj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	
		<!-- postpositions -->

		<pardef n="__gen_endings">
			<!-- genitives (CHECK) -->
			<e> 		<p><l>चा</l><r>चा<s n="gen"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ची</l><r>ची<s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>चे</l><r>चे<s n="gen"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>चे</l><r>चे<s n="gen"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>च्या</l><r>च्या<s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ची</l><r>ची<s n="gen"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>च्या</l><r>च्या<s n="gen"/><s n="obl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__sg_case">
			<!-- singulars -->
			<e> 		<p><l>ला</l><r>ला<s n="acc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ने</l><r>ने<s n="erg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>नी</l><r>नी<s n="erg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ला</l><r>ला<s n="dat"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>हून</l><r>हून<s n="abl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>त</l><r>त<s n="loc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="__gen_endings"/></e>

		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__pl_case">
			<!-- plurals -->
			<e> 		<p><l>ना</l><r>ना<s n="acc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>नी</l><r>नी<s n="erg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ना</l><r>ना<s n="dat"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>हून</l><r>हून<s n="abl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>त</l><r>त<s n="loc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="__gen_endings"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<e lm=""> 								<i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
		<e lm=""> 								<i></i><par n="__inj"/></e>
		<e lm=""> 								<i></i><par n="__gen_endings"/></e>
		<e lm=""> 								<i></i><par n="__sg_case" /></e>
		<e lm=""> 								<i></i><par n="__pl_case" /></e>
		<e lm="मात्र"> 						<i>मात्र</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="फक्त"> 							<i>फक्त</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="केवळ"> 							<i>केवळ</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="सुद्धा"> 						<i>सुद्धा</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="पण"> 							<i>पण</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="देखील"> 						<i>देखील</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="न"> 								<i>न</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="हो"> 							<i>हो</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="होय"> 							<i>होय</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="नाही"> 						<i>नाही</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="बर"> 								<i>बर</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="फार"> 							<i>फार</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="अगदी"> 							<i>अगदी</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="ठार"> 							<i>ठार</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="एक"> 							<i>एक</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="मुळीच"> 						<i>मुळीच</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="अ"> 								<i>अ</i><par n="__part"/></e>
		<e lm="आणि">							<i>आणि</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="अन">								<i>अन</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="आणखी"> 						<i>आणखी</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="व">								<i>व</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="पण">								<i>पण</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="वा">							<i>वा</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="परंतु">							<i>परंतु</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="किंवा">						<i>किंवा</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="अथवा">							<i>अथवा</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="म्हणून">						<i>म्हणून</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="तेंव्हा">						<i>तेंव्हा</i><par n="__cnjcoo" /></e>
		<e lm="कि">							<i>कि</i><par n="__cnjsub" /></e>
		<e lm="कारण"> 							<i>कारण</i><par n="__cnjsub"/></e>
		<e lm="म्हणून">						<i>म्हणून</i><par n="__cnjsub" /></e>
		<e lm="जर">								<i>जर</i><par n="__cnjsub" /></e>
		<e lm="तर">								<i>जर</i><par n="__cnjsub" /></e>
		<e lm="म्हणजे"> 						<i>म्हणजे</i><par n="__cnjsub" /></e>
		<e lm="असे"> 							<i>असे</i><par n="__cnjsub" /></e>
		<e lm="असही"> 							<i>असेही</i><par n="__cnjsub" /></e>
		<e lm="थोडक्यात"> 					<i>थोडक्यात</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="कदाचित"> 						<i>कदाचित</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="शक्यतो"> 					<i>शक्यतो</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="नक्किच"> 					<i>नक्किच</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="सुदैवाने"> 					<i>सुदैवाने</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="उगाच"> 					<i>उगाच</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="मुकाट्याने"> 					<i>मुकाट्याने</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="नक्की"> 					<i>नक्की</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="बेशक"> 					<i>बेशक</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="मात्र"> 					<i>मात्र</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="तातपर्य"> 					<i>तातपर्य</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="तातपऱ्य"> 					<i>तातपरऱ्य</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="उलट"> 					<i>उलट</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="शिवाय"> 					<i>शिवाय</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
		<e lm="कसय"> 					<i>कसय</i><par n="__adsen"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
	<e><par n="barb"/></e>
